apertium-en-hi.hi.dix
    <pardef n="/हो__vblex_iv">
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगे</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाला</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाले</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होना</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होने</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुआ</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>बोले</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होता</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होते</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होकर</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होके</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुआ</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुई</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुईं</l><r>हो<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/><s n="perf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="/हो__vbser">
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगे</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगे</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगा</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगे</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होंगी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाला</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाले</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होनेवाली</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="agnt"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होना</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होने</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हूँ</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हैं</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>है</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हैं</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हुए</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="frm"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>हो</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होता</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होते</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होती</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होकर</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>होके</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="gna"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>था</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>थे</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>थी</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>थीं</l><r>हो<s n="vbser"/><s n="impf"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="हो"><i></i><par n="/हो__vblex_iv"/></e>
    <e lm="हो"><i></i><par n="/हो__vbser"/></e>
